Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Chapter 2. State Police Officers’ Retirement System.

§ 51.1-200.
State Police Officers’ Retirement System continued; administration; application of provisions of Virginia Retirement System.

The State Police Officers’ Retirement System is continued and shall be administered by the Board of Trustees of the Virginia Retirement System. Except as otherwise provided, the provisions of Chapter 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.) of this title shall apply to and govern the operation of the State Police Officers’ Retirement System.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 51-128, 51-140, 51-143; 1950, pp. 883, 885; 1954, c. 139; 1966, c. 628; 1990, c. 832.

Cross references.

As to health insurance credits for certain retirees, see §

51.1-1400

et seq.

As to annual audit of the system, see § 30-81.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1995, c. 152, cl. 10, effective March 10, 1995 and Acts 1995, c. 811, cl. 10, effective April 6, 1995, provide: “That in keeping with the purposes of this act and as part of the restructuring plan of the Department of State Police and upon the Governor’s approval, members of the State Police Officers’ Retirement System (§

51.1-200

et seq. of the Code of Virginia) may participate in the incentive programs described in the second and third enactments of this act. Upon the Governor’s approval of any restructuring plan, but no earlier than April 1, 1995, and no later than June 30, 1996, an eligible employee shall make written application to participate in the incentive program described in the (i) second enactment of this act to his employing agency or (ii) third enactment of this act to the Virginia Retirement System. Positions and funds associated with any restructuring plan approved by the Governor shall not be subject to the provisions of § 2.1-391 [see now §

2.2-1501

] of the Code of Virginia. Retirements and resignations under this enactment shall be effective no later than July 1, 1996. The costs associated with an employee’s resignation or retirement pursuant to the incentive programs established by the second or third enactment of this act shall be paid in the same manner as is prescribed in § 2.1-116.25 [see now §

2.2-3205

] of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 1995, c. 152, cl. 11, effective March 10, 1995 and Acts 1995, c. 811, cl. 11, effective April 6, 1995, provide: “That any employee of the Commonwealth who applied for retirement under the Virginia Retirement System (§

51.1-124.1

et seq. of the Code of Virginia) or the State Police Officers’ Retirement System (§

51.1-200

et seq. of the Code of Virginia) on or before December 1, 1994, shall not be eligible for the incentive programs established in the second or third enactments of this act, or for the benefits provided by Chapter 10.5 (§ 2.1-116.20 et seq.) [see now §

2.2-3200

et seq.] of the Code of Virginia.”

§ 51.1-201.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Employee”
means a state police officer.

“Member”
means any person included in the membership of the retirement system as provided in this chapter.

“Normal retirement date”
means a member’s sixtieth birthday.

“Retirement system”
means the State Police Officers’ Retirement System.

History.

1966, c. 628, § 51-144; 1972, c. 568; 1973, c. 523; 1974, c. 353; 1975, c. 597; 1984, c. 430; 1990, c. 832.

§ 51.1-202.
Membership in retirement system.

Membership in the retirement system shall be compulsory for all state police officers.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 51-130, 51-136.2, § 51-145; 1950, p. 883; 1954, c. 139; 1966, c. 628; 1990, c. 832; 2003, c. 624.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 624, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending §§

51.1-138

,

51.1-202

,

51.1-205

, and

51.1-206

shall expire on July 1, 2005. On and after July 1, 2005, no person shall receive a retirement allowance under the State Police Officers’ Retirement System while employed as a state police officer or as an employee, as defined in §

51.1-124.3

, of the Department of State Police pursuant to the provisions of this act.” The section is set out above without the amendments by Acts 2003, c. 624.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 624 inserted “Except as provided in subsection A of §

51.1-205

and subsections D and E of §

51.1-206

.”

For expiration of this amendment, see the editor’s note.

§ 51.1-203.
Creditable service.

Service qualifying for credit under the provisions of the Virginia Retirement System shall be included as creditable service for the purposes of this chapter, provided the requirements set forth in Chapter 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.) of this title for crediting service have been complied with and any payment required is credited in the member’s contribution account.

If a member ceases to be employed as a state police officer, has not received a refund of the accumulated contributions credited to his member’s contribution account, and accepts employment in a position covered by the Virginia Retirement System or the Judicial Retirement System, he shall be entitled to credit for his previous creditable service under this chapter. His accumulated contributions shall be transferred and credited to his member’s contribution account in the appropriate retirement system. Future retirement rights shall be as set forth under the provisions of the appropriate retirement system.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 51-131, 51-133, 51-134, 51-146; 1950, p. 884; 1954, c. 139; 1956, c. 562; 1960, c. 559; 1962, c. 585; 1966, c. 628; 1968, c. 648; 1970, c. 657; 1974, c. 353; 1976, c. 540, § 51-111.41:4; 1977, c. 620; 1978, c. 841; 1980, c. 89; 1982, c. 467; 1984, c. 430; 1986, c. 474; 1988, c. 809; 1990, c. 832; 2001, cc. 686, 697.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, cc. 686 and 697, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect any contract for the purchase of service entered into between a member and the Virginia Retirement System before the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2001, cc. 686 and 697, cl. 4 provides: “That any rights granted under §§

51.1-142

,

51.1-142

.1 and

51.1-143

, as such rights existed in these sections immediately before the effective date of this act, and only to the extent that such rights conflict with the provisions of this act, shall remain in effect until July 1, 2002.”

Acts 2010, cc. 737 and 738, cl. 3 provides: “That any person who prior to March 15, 2010, has entered into a written contract for employment in a covered position, for retirement purposes under Title 51.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall not be deemed to be a ‘person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010,’ as defined in §

51.1-124.3

of the Code of Virginia solely because the person commences employment pursuant to the contract on or after July 1, 2010.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 686 and 697 are identical, and deleted subsection B, which formerly read: “Service purchased in accordance with the provisions of §

51.1-143

shall not be considered: 1. In determining the actuarial equivalent for early retirement. 2. In determining the twenty years of service requirement of subsection B of §

51.1-206

, except for that which had been rendered in a hazardous position and had been credited in the retirement system of a political subdivision of this Commonwealth. 3. Twice in determining any disability allowance payable under this chapter”; and redesignated former subsection C as subsection B.

§ 51.1-204.
Contributions by Commonwealth.

The Commonwealth shall contribute an amount equal to the sum of the normal contribution, any accrued liability contribution, and any supplementary contribution.
The amount shall be determined and paid as provided in Chapter 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.) of this title.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 51-138, 51-140, 51-148; 1950, p. 885; 1954, c. 139; 1966, c. 628; 1970, c. 657; 1982, c. 467; 1990, c. 832.

Cross references.

As to health insurance credits for certain retirees, see §

51.1-1400

et seq.

§ 51.1-205.
Service retirement generally.

Normal retirement. — Any member in service at his normal retirement date with five or more years of creditable service (i) as a member in the retirement system established by this chapter, (ii) as a member in the retirement system established by Chapter 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.), or (iii) while earning the benefits permitted by §

51.1-138

may retire upon written notification to the Board, setting forth the date the retirement is to become effective. Any member, except one appointed by the Governor or elected by the people, or a regional jail or jail farm superintendent, who attains 70 years of age shall be retired within 60 days of attaining age 70. Any employer, subsequent to the employee’s normal retirement date, may provide for compulsory service retirement upon a determination that age is a bona fide occupational qualification reasonably necessary to the normal operation of the particular business or that the employee is incapable of performing his duties in a safe and efficient manner. Any such determination shall be made by the employer.Effective December 31, 2003, any member in service on June 30, 2002, and July 1, 2002, who is credited with five or more years of creditable service rendered under Chapter 1 (§

51.1-100

et seq.), this chapter, or Chapter 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.) shall not be subject to the vesting requirements of this section, and §§

51.1-138

and

51.1-216

.

Early retirement. — Any member in service who has attained his fiftieth birthday with five or more years of creditable service (i) as a member in the retirement system established by this chapter, (ii) as a member in the retirement system established by Chapter 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.), or (iii) while earning the benefits permitted by §

51.1-138

may retire upon written notification to the Board setting forth the date the retirement is to become effective.Effective December 31, 2003, any member in service on June 30, 2002, and July 1, 2002, who is credited with five or more years of creditable service rendered under Chapter 1 (§

51.1-100

et seq.), this chapter, or Chapter 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.) shall not be subject to the vesting requirements of this section, and §§

51.1-138

and

51.1-216

.

Deferred retirement for members terminating service. — Any member who terminates service after five or more years of creditable service (i) as a member in the retirement system established by this chapter, (ii) as a member in the retirement system established by Chapter 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.), or (iii) while earning the benefits permitted by §

51.1-138

, may retire under the provisions of subsection A, B, or D if he has not withdrawn his accumulated contributions prior to the effective date of his retirement or if he has five or more years of creditable service (a) as a member in the retirement system established by this chapter, (b) as a member in the retirement system established by Chapter 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.), or (c) while earning the benefits permitted by §

51.1-138

, regardless of termination date, for which his employer has paid the contributions and such contributions cannot be withdrawn. For the purposes of this subsection, any requirements as to the member being in service shall not apply.Effective December 31, 2003, any member in service on June 30, 2002, and July 1, 2002, who is credited with five or more years of creditable service rendered under Chapter 1 (§

51.1-100

et seq.), this chapter, or Chapter 2.1 (§ 51.1-211 et seq.) shall not be subject to the vesting requirements of this section, and §§

51.1-138

and

51.1-216

.

Effective date of retirement. — The effective date of retirement shall be after the last day of service of the member, but shall not be more than 90 days prior to the filing of the notice of retirement.

Notification on behalf of member. — If the member is physically or mentally unable to submit written notification of his intention to retire, the member’s appointing authority may submit notification on his behalf.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 51-134, 51-150; 1950, p. 884; 1954, c. 139; 1956, c. 562; 1962, c. 585; 1966, c. 628; 1970, c. 657; 1977, c. 620; 1982, c. 427; 1984, c. 430; 1986, c. 474; 1988, c. 222; 1989, c. 484; 1990, c. 832; 1995, cc. 152, 692, 811; 1996, c. 997; 1999, c. 111; 2000, cc. 66, 657, 911; 2002, c. 466; 2003, c. 624; 2004, c. 83; 2005, c. 146; 2008, c. 28; 2011, c. 483; 2012, c. 85.

Cross references.

As to health insurance credits for certain retirees, see §

51.1-1400

et seq.

As to eligible state employees opting for a combination of age and/or creditable service retirement credits in lieu of transitional severance benefits, see §

2.2-3204

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1989, c. 484, cl. 3 provides that benefits payable upon the retirement or death of a member prior to July 1, 1990, shall be determined under the provisions of Chapter 6 of Title 51 of the Code of Virginia as it existed prior to July 1, 1990.

Acts 2003, c. 624, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending §§

51.1-138

,

51.1-202

,

51.1-205

, and

51.1-206

shall expire on July 1, 2005. On and after July 1, 2005, no person shall receive a retirement allowance under the State Police Officers’ Retirement System while employed as a state police officer or as an employee, as defined in §

51.1-124.3

, of the Department of State Police pursuant to the provisions of this act.” This section is set out above without the changes by Acts 2003, c. 624.

The 1999 amendment

inserted “regardless of termination date” in subsection C.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 66 and 657 are identical, and substituted “Human Resource Management” for “Personnel and Training” in the former second sentence of subsection D.

The 2000 amendment by c. 911 deleted the former second sentence of subsection D, which read: “A member shall not be eligible for retirement pursuant to this subsection unless the member has entered into a binding agreement with the Department of Personnel and Training providing that the member shall not thereafter reenter into full-time or part-time employment with any agency in the executive branch of the Commonwealth for a period of two years following retirement.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 466 inserted “(i) as a member in the retirement system established by this chapter, (ii) as a member in the retirement system established by Chapter 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.) of Title 51.1, or (iii) while earning the benefits permitted by §

51.1-138

” in the first sentence of subsection A, in subsection B, and in the first sentence of subsection C, and inserted “(a) as a member in the retirement system established by this chapter, (b) as a member in the retirement system established by Chapter 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.) of Title 51.1, or (c) while earning the benefits permitted by §

51.1-138

” in the first sentence of subsection C.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 83, effective March 12, 2004, throughout the section, substituted “this title” for “Title 51.1”; substituted “70” for “seventy” in the second sentence of the first paragraph in subsection A and added the last paragraph in subsections A through C; substituted “10” for “ten” in subsection D; and substituted “90” for “ninety” in subsection E.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 146 deleted the former subsection D which read:
“50/10 retirement. — Any member in service on or before January 1, 1994, who has attained his fiftieth birthday with 10 or more years of creditable service may retire prior to his normal retirement date upon written notification to the Board setting forth the date the retirement is to become effective,” and redesignated former subsections E and F as present subsections D and E.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 28 substituted “shall be retired withing 60 days of attaining age 70” for “shall be retired forthwith” at the end of the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 483 deleted the former last two sentences in the first paragraph of subsection C, which read: “No member shall be entitled to the benefits of this subsection if his employer certifies that his service was terminated because of dishonesty, malfeasance, or malfeasance in office. The certification may be appealed to the Board.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 85, effective March 6, 2012, deleted “of this title” following “(§

51.1-211

et seq.)” throughout the section; inserted “or a regional jail or jail farm superintendent” in the second sentence of the first paragraph in subsection A; and deleted “of this section” following “subsection A, B, or D” in the first paragraph of subsection C.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14B M.J. Pensions, § 2.

§ 51.1-206.
Service retirement allowance.

A member shall receive an annual retirement allowance, payable for life, as follows:

Normal retirement. — The allowance shall equal the amount of creditable service multiplied by (i) 1.70 percent of his average final compensation for retirements prior to July 1, 2007, and (ii) 1.85 percent of his average final compensation for retirements on or after July 1, 2007.For retirements between October 1, 1994, and December 31, 1998, any state police officer who is a member or beneficiary of a retirement system administered by the Board shall receive an additional retirement allowance equal to three percent of the service or disability retirement allowance payable under this section. Average final compensation attributable to service as Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, or member of the General Assembly shall not be included in computing this additional retirement allowance.

Early retirement. — The allowance shall be determined in the same manner as for normal retirement with creditable service and average final compensation being determined as of the date of actual retirement. If the member has less than 25 years of service at retirement, the amount of the retirement allowance shall be reduced on an actuarial equivalent basis for the period by which the actual retirement date precedes the earlier of (i) his normal retirement date or (ii) the first date on or after his fiftieth birthday on which he would have completed a total of 25 years of creditable service.

In addition to the allowance payable under subsection A, a member shall receive annually from the date of his retirement until his retirement age, as such term is defined under the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 416 et seq., as now or hereafter amended), an allowance equal to $9,264. Beginning July 1, 2001, and biennially thereafter, such allowance shall be reviewed and adjusted by the Board to an amount recommended by the actuary of the Virginia Retirement System based upon increases in social security benefits in the interim.This subsection shall not apply to the following: (i) any member who qualifies for retirement under subsection C of §

51.1-205

and is credited with less than 20 years’ service rendered in a hazardous position or (ii) any member employed initially on or after July 1, 1974, who is credited with less than 20 years’ service rendered in a hazardous position. However, any service rendered as an employee, as such term is defined in §

51.1-212

, shall be deemed as service in a hazardous position for purposes of the additional retirement allowance herein.

If a beneficiary of a service retirement allowance under this chapter is at any time in service as an employee in a position covered for retirement purposes under the provisions of this or any chapter other than Chapter 7 (§

51.1-700

et seq.) of this title, his retirement allowance shall cease while so employed.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 51-135, 51-151; 1950, p. 885; 1954, c. 139; 1956, c. 562; 1966, c. 628; 1968, c. 647; 1970, c. 657; 1972, c. 568; 1973, cc. 290, 523; 1974, c. 353; 1976, cc. 525, 538; 1978, c. 841; 1981, c. 393; 1984, c. 430; 1986, c. 73; 1989, c. 484; 1990, c. 832; 1992, c. 815; 1993, cc. 408, 568; 1994, 1st Sp. Sess., c. 5; 1995, cc. 152, 692, 811; 1998, cc. 674, 676; 2000, c. 911; 2001, c. 804; 2003, c. 624; 2004, c. 687; 2005, c. 146; 2007, c. 819.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1981, c. 403, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of § 51-151(e) [see now subsection C of this section] of the Code shall not be applicable to magistrates serving as special magistrates pursuant to Chapter 4 of Title 19.2 on July 1, 1980.”

Acts 1989, c. 484, cl. 3 provides that benefits payable upon the retirement or death of a member prior to July 1, 1990, shall be determined under the provisions of Chapter 6 of Title 51 of the Code of Virginia as it existed prior to July 1, 1990.

Acts 1994, 1st Sp. Sess., c. 5, cl. 4 provides: “That the Commonwealth shall bear the cost of any increase in the employer contribution rate as a result of the additional retirement allowances payable under this act through amendments to §§

51.1-155

,

51.1-157

,

51.1-206

,

51.1-306

, and

51.1-308

for teachers recognized in the standards of quality and for Compensation Board approved salaries of local officers.”

Acts 1994, 1st Sp. Sess., c. 5, cl. 5 provides: “That the Director of the Department of Planning and Budget shall report and make recommendations to the 1995 Session of the General Assembly regarding the state and local shares of the cost to fund the additional retirement allowances payable under this act through amendments to §§

51.1-155

,

51.1-157

,

51.1-206

,

51.1-306

, and

51.1-308

for teachers who are not recognized in the standards of quality and local officers who are not approved by the Compensation Board.”

Acts 1998, c. 674, cl. 2 provides: “That members who retire on or before December 31, 1998, shall receive a two percent increase in their retirement allowances.”

Acts 2001, c. 804, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect retirement benefits for retirements that are effective prior to July 1, 2001, except as provided in §

51.1-206

.”

Acts 2003, c. 624, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of subsection E of §

51.1-206

shall not become effective unless the Virginia Retirement System receives a written ruling from the Internal Revenue Service (IRS) that affirmatively states that the provisions of such subsection, were they to become effective, will not in any way adversely affect the qualified plan status of the Virginia Retirement System under federal law. The Virginia Retirement System shall seek such IRS ruling as soon as practicable in regard to the impact on such qualified plan status from the provisions of such subsection. Upon receipt of a written response from the IRS on such question, the Virginia Retirement System shall make the final determination, which shall be consistent with such IRS ruling or determination, whether the provisions of such subsection in any way adversely affect the qualified plan status of the Virginia Retirement System under federal law.” The provisions of subsection E never became effective since the written ruling received from the IRS in February 2003 regarding the provisions of §

51.1-206

E failed to affirm that the provisions of the subsection would not in any way adversely affect the Virginia Retirement System plan under federal law.

Acts 2003, c. 624, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending §§

51.1-138

,

51.1-202

,

51.1-205

, and

51.1-206

shall expire on July 1, 2005. On and after July 1, 2005, no person shall receive a retirement allowance under the State Police Officers’ Retirement System while employed as a state police officer or as an employee, as defined in §

51.1-124.3

, of the Department of State Police pursuant to the provisions of this act.” The section is set out above without the changes by Acts 2003, c. 624.

Acts 2004, c. 687, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to persons who first retire pursuant to Title 51.1 of the Code of Virginia on or after October 1, 1999, with a retirement benefit pursuant to §

51.1-138

or Chapter 2 (§

51.1-200

et seq.) of Title 51.1 of the Code of Virginia. The Virginia Retirement System shall make such necessary adjustments to the retirement benefits of affected persons who have retired prior to the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2007, c. 819, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Trustees of the Virginia Retirement System shall permit the localities that were not providing retirement benefits to their deputy sheriffs pursuant to subsection B of §

51.1-138

of the Code of Virginia prior to July 1, 2008, to implement a five-year phase-in of the additional cost to the localities resulting from the requirements prescribed under subsection D of §

51.1-138

.”

Acts 2007, c. 819, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending §

51.1-138

of the Code of Virginia that relate to retirement benefits for deputy sheriffs and Compensation Board funding of the same shall not apply to any county or city that (i) participates in the Virginia Retirement System (§

51.1-124.1

et seq. of the Code of Virginia), (ii) has in effect a retirement supplement for deputy sheriffs (in addition to the annual retirement allowance provided under the Virginia Retirement System) that exceeds the allowance set forth in subsection B of §

51.1-206

of the Code of Virginia, and (iii) provides the same level of retirement benefits to all of its deputy sheriffs, including any deputy sheriff whose salary is not funded or reimbursed in part by the Compensation Board. However, the Compensation Board shall, beginning with 2007-2008 fiscal year and for fiscal years thereafter, fund or reimburse a portion of the additional costs incurred by such county or city in providing such retirement supplement to those deputy sheriffs of the county or city whose salaries are funded or reimbursed in whole or in part by the Compensation Board. The Compensation Board funding shall be based on the county’s or city’s local fiscal stress index and shall be based on amounts set forth in the appropriation act.”

The 1998 amendment

substituted “$8,952” for “$7,080” in subsection B.

The 1998 amendments.

The 1998 amendment by c. 674, effective January 1, 1999, in subsection A, in subdivision 1, in the first paragraph, substituted “1.70 percent of his” for “1.50 percent of the first $13,200 of” and deleted “plus 1.65 percent of average final compensation in excess of $13,200, multiplied by the amount of creditable service. If the member is credited with thirty-five or more years of service, he shall receive 1.65 percent of his average final compensation” following “average final compensation,” and in subdivision 1, in the second paragraph, in the first sentence, substituted “For retirements between” for “On and after,” and inserted “and December 31, 1998”; and in subsection B, substituted “$8,952” for “$7,080.”

The 1998 amendment by c. 676 substituted “$8,952” for “$7,080” in subsection B.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 911, in subsection B, in the first paragraph, deleted “of this section” following “subsection A,” inserted “annually from the date of his retirement until his sixty-fifth birthday,” deleted “additional” preceding “allowance equal,” substituted “$9,264. Beginning July 1, 2001, and biennially thereafter” for “$8,952 annually from date of retirement until his sixty-fifth birthday,” and transferred the former first sentence of the second paragraph to the end of the first paragraph and deleted “biennially” following “by the Board” in said sentence.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 804 substituted “retirement age, as such term is defined under the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 416 et seq., as now or hereafter amended),” for “sixty-fifth birthday” in the first sentence in subsection B.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 624 substituted “20” for “twenty” and “25” for “twenty-five” in subsections A and B; inserted “Except as provided in subsection D or E” at the beginning of subsection C; and added subsections D and E.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 687, effective until July 1, 2005, added the last sentence in the second paragraph of subsection B.

The 2004 amendment by c. 687 substituted “25” for “twenty-five” in subdivision A 2 and A 3; in the second paragraph of subsection B, substituted “20” for “twenty” twice and added the last sentence.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by 146 deleted the former subdivision A 3 which read:
“50/10 retirement. — The allowance shall be payable in a monthly stream of payments equal to the greater of (i) the amount the member would receive if he had taken early retirement or (ii) the actuarially calculated present value of the member’s accumulated contributions, including accrued interest.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 819 rewrote subdivision A 1, which read: “Normal retirement. — The allowance shall equal 1.70 percent of his average final compensation multiplied by the amount of creditable service.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Age of eligibility. —

The distinction in age for eligibility for an annual allowance under the Virginia Law Officers Retirement System and the State Police Officers’ Retirement System does not constitute impermissible age discrimination. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frederick M. Quayle, Member, Senate of Virginia, 10-013, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 12, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 23 (3/17/10).

§ 51.1-207.
Death before retirement.

If a member dies before retirement, and if no benefits are payable under subsection B, the amount of his accumulated contributions shall be paid to the designated beneficiary or to a surviving relative according to the same order of precedence as set forth in subsection A of §

51.1-162

. This amount shall be reduced by the amount of any retirement allowance previously received by the member under this chapter or the abolished system. Each member shall designate who is to receive a refund of accumulated contributions credited to his account in the event of the death of the member prior to retirement. The designation must be made on a form prepared by the Board, signed and filed in a manner prescribed by the Board. The designation may be changed by the member by the written designation of some other person, signed and filed in a manner prescribed by the Board.If no designation has been made, or the death of the designated person occurs prior to the death of the member and another designation has not been made, the proceeds shall be paid to the persons surviving at the death of the member in the same order of precedence as set forth in subsection A of §

51.1-162

.

To the extent required by § 401(a)(37) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended or renumbered, and the regulations thereunder applicable to governmental plans, if a member dies in service, including a member performing active duty military service in the armed forces of the United States, and if no benefits are payable under subsection C, a retirement allowance shall be paid to the person designated as provided in subsection A of this section if the person is the member’s (i) surviving spouse, (ii) minor child, or (iii) parent(s). If no designation has been made, or if the death of the designated person occurs prior to the death of the member and another designation has not been made, a retirement allowance shall be paid in the same order of precedence as set forth in subsection B of §

51.1-162

. The retirement allowance shall be continued during the lifetime of the person or in the case of a minor child until the child dies or attains the age of majority, whichever occurs first. The retirement allowance shall equal the decreased retirement allowance that would have been payable under the joint and survivor option so that the same amount would be continued to such person after the member’s death. If the member dies prior to his fiftieth birthday, then, for purposes of this subsection, the member shall be presumed to be age 50 on his date of death. When determining the allowance that would have been payable to the member had the member retired on the date of his death, the provisions of subsection B of §

51.1-206

shall not apply. If the person elects in writing, the amount of the member’s accumulated contributions shall be paid to the person exclusively, in lieu of any other benefits under this section. This amount shall be reduced by the amount of any retirement allowance previously received by the member.

If a member dies in service from a cause compensable under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act (§

65.2-100

et seq.), a retirement allowance shall be paid to the member’s surviving spouse. If no compensation is finally awarded under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act due to legal proceedings or otherwise resulting in settlement from the persons causing such death, the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Commission shall determine whether the member’s death was from a cause compensable under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act. If the member leaves no surviving spouse or the surviving spouse dies, any minor children of the deceased member shall be paid an allowance until the children die or attain the age of majority, whichever occurs first. If more than one minor child survives the deceased member, the allowance shall be divided in a manner determined by the Board. If the deceased member leaves neither surviving spouse nor minor child, the allowance, divided in a manner determined by the Board, shall be paid to the member’s parents during their lives.The retirement allowance, payable hereunder to a qualifying survivor, shall be the annual amount which when added to the compensation payable under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act for the death of the member, shall equal 50 percent of the member’s average final compensation if the survivor does not qualify for death benefits under the provisions of the Social Security Act in effect on the date of the death of the member. If the survivor qualifies for death benefits under the provisions of the Social Security Act in effect on the date of the death of the member, the allowance payable from the retirement system when added to the compensation payable under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act shall equal thirty-three and one-third percent of the member’s average final compensation.Any beneficiary entitled to the entire amount of a retirement allowance under the provisions of this subsection as a result of the death of a member shall be entitled to waive his rights to the allowance by written notification to the Board within 90 days after the death of the member in order to make available a retirement allowance under the provisions of subsection B.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 51-136.1, 51-156; 1954, c. 139; 1958, c. 624; 1966, c. 628; 1970, c. 657; 1972, c. 568; 1973, c. 523; 1974, c. 353; 1976, c. 654; 1986, c. 474; 1988, cc. 531, 540; 1989, c. 484; 1990, c. 832; 1998, c. 407; 1999, cc. 111, 510; 2001, c. 683; 2002, c. 313; 2009, c. 22; 2012, c. 696; 2015, c. 660.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1989, c. 484, cl. 3 provides that benefits payable upon the retirement or death of a member prior to July 1, 1990, shall be determined under the provisions of Chapter 6 of Title 51 of the Code of Virginia as it existed prior to July 1, 1990.

Acts 2001, c. 683, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to surviving spouses of members regardless of whether they are remarried before or after the effective date of this act. However, neither the Commonwealth, nor any of its political subdivisions, nor the Virginia Retirement System shall be liable for any retirement allowance, as provided under the amendments of this act, to such surviving spouses for any period prior to the effective date of this act.”

The 1998 amendment,

in subsection A, in the introductory language, substituted “in a manner prescribed by” for “with” in two places; and in subsection B, in the first sentence, inserted “wholly dependent” twice, added the second sentence, and in the third sentence, substituted “orders” for “order.”

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by c. 111, in subsection B, deleted “wholly dependent” following clauses (iii) and (iv) in four places; in subsection C, in the last sentence, inserted “divided in a manner determined by the Board,” and substituted “during their lives” for “wholly dependent upon him for support, divided in a manner determined by the Board, during the lives of the parents.”

The 1999 amendment by c. 510 substituted “The retirement allowance shall equal the decreased retirement allowance that would have been payable under the joint and survivor option so that the same amount would be continued to such person after the member’s death. If the member dies prior to his fiftieth birthday, then, for purposes of this subsection, the member shall be presumed to be age fifty on his date of death” for “The allowance shall equal one-half of the retirement allowance that would have been payable to the member had the member retired for early service retirement on the date of his death and elected to have his allowance payable under the joint and last-survivor option so that one-half thereof would be continued to such person after the member’s death. In the case of a member who had not attained his fiftieth birthday at his date of death, it shall be assumed that the member’s age at his date of death is fifty for the purpose of reducing the benefit on an actuarial equivalent basis. If a member dies after attaining his sixtieth birthday, the allowance shall equal the decreased retirement allowance that would have been payable to the member had the member retired at his normal retirement age on the date of his death and elected to have his allowance payable under the joint and last-survivor option so that the same amount would be continued to such person after the member’s death” in subsection B.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 683 deleted “or remarries” following “surviving spouse dies” in the second sentence of the first paragraph of subsection C.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 313 rewrote subsection A and the first sentence in subsection B.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 22, in the first paragraph of subsection A, deleted “acknowledged by the member before a person authorized to take acknowledgments, and” preceding “filed in a manner” in the next-to-last sentence and deleted “acknowledged” preceding “and filed in a manner” in the last sentence; and deleted “under seal and duly acknowledged” following “elects in writing” in the next-to-last sentence of subsection B.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 696 inserted “including a member who is on leave without pay while performing active duty military service in the armed forces of the United States” near the beginning of the first sentence in subsection B; deleted “of this section” at the end of the last paragraph in subsection C; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 660 substituted “To the extent required by § 401(a)(37) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended or renumbered, and the regulations thereunder applicable to governmental plans, if a member dies in service, including a member” for “If a member dies in service, including a member who is on leave without pay while” at the beginning of subsection B.